Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-761
Enforcement of agreement.

All courts, departments, agencies, officers and employees of this state and its political subdivisions are hereby directed to enforce the Agreement on Detainers and to cooperate with one another and with other party states in enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose.

Laws 1963, c. 154, § 3, p. 551.